Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.3901

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 209.

If any provision of *this 1969 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 42. Formerly RCW 41.26.900.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "this 1969 amendatory act," see note following chapter digest.